Georgia statutes. 
See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Certificates not to be charged against general credit. - Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) is designed to provide for self-liquidating projects and the revenue bonds therein contemplated are not to be a charge against the general credit of the county or municipality. The liability is to be satisfied only from revenues produced by the undertaking and under the specific terms of the statute, the political division will never be required to aid in its retirement with funds derived from any other source, and is in fact prohibited from doing so. The article is not unconstitutional by virtue of violating the constitutional limitation on municipal debts in Ga. Const. 1877, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I). Miller v. Head, 186 Ga. 694, 198 S.E. 680 (1938).

Superior rights not gained by prior proceeding to validate certificates. - There is nothing contained in the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) which expressly or by necessary implication gives that municipality which institutes proceedings first for the validation of the municipality's bonds, and the confirmation of the security for the payment thereof, superior rights over another municipality which may file proceedings to validate and conform the security for the municipality's bonds subsequently thereto; this is true although the two proposed districts may embrace the same area or portions of the same area. Dade County v. State, 202 Ga. 191, 42 S.E.2d 439 (1947).

City's proceeding to validate bonds not barred by county filing proceeding to validate bonds for overlapping water district. - When the governing body of a county has fully complied with all the provisions of the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) in the creation of a water district and caused proceedings to be filed for the validation of the county's bonds, the fact that the governing body of a city located wholly within the area embraced in the county's district has likewise fully complied with all the provisions of the law in the creation of a water district comprised only of the area located within its corporate limits, and caused proceedings to be filed to validate and confirm its bonds, does not constitute a legal reason why the city's bonds should not be validated and confirmed. Dade County v. State, 202 Ga. 191, 42 S.E.2d 439 (1947).

Standing to challenge bond validation. - Appeal filed by challengers to a trial court judgment confirming and validating a city's bond issuance was dismissed because the challengers failed to present any evidence to establish the challengers' standing under O.C.G.A. § 36-82-77(a) to become parties in the bond validation proceeding; thus, the challengers lacked standing to appeal the judgment in that proceeding. Sherman v. City of Atlanta, 317 Ga. 345, 730 S.E.2d 113 (2013).

Trial court properly dismissed a county resident's preemptive declaratory judgment action challenging the issuance of bonds for a development project on the ground that a bond validation petition under the Georgia Revenue Bond Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-82-60 et seq., in which the resident intervened was the exclusive forum for adjudication of the resident's claims. Courts are not to render declaratory judgments if other statutory remedies have been specifically provided, as was the case here, and the resident's claims were adequately addressed and adjudicated in the validation proceeding. Woodham v. City of Atlanta, 283 Ga. 95, 657 S.E.2d 528 (2008).

Use of local school taxes for redevelopment. - School system, development authority, and others were properly granted summary judgment in a suit challenging the allocation of school taxes because the 2008 amendments to Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. VII(b) and O.C.G.A. § 36-44-9(g), governing tax allocation districts, changed the law and retroactively allowed use of local school taxes for general redevelopment purposes. Sherman v. Atlanta Indep. Sch. Sys., 293 Ga. 268, 744 S.E.2d 26 (2013).

Cited in Dade County v. State, 77 Ga. App. 139, 48 S.E.2d 144 (1948); United States v. City of Rossville, 249 F. Supp. 701 (N.D. Ga. 1966); Copeland v. State, 268 Ga. 375, 490 S.E.2d 68 (1997).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 13, 74.

36-82-61. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Governing body" means the board, commission, council, or other local legislative body of a governmental body.

(2) (A) "Governmental body" means any school district, county, or municipal corporation of this state.

(B) The term "governmental body" shall also mean and include highway districts of the state which have been or may hereafter be created as political subdivisions of the state, which shall have the same rights and powers to operate under this article as have counties, municipal corporations, and school districts. Such highway districts as political subdivisions of the state shall be limited, however, in such undertakings to the construction, acquisition, and building of highways, bridges, causeways, approaches, viaducts, tunnels, and all things incidental to the improvement of highways located within their respective districts as created by the Constitution and laws of this state.

(C) The term "governmental body" shall also mean and include state and local public authorities having corporate powers which have been or may hereafter be created by general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly. Such state or local authorities are fully empowered to issue revenue-anticipation certificates and to operate under this article in the same manner and to the same extent as counties or municipal corporations of the state are authorized to do.

(D) For the purposes of Code Sections 36-82-74 through 36-82-82, inclusive, the term "governmental body," in addition to its definitions in subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph, means a hospital authority the revenue certificates of which are required by Code Section 31-7-81 to be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure of this article.

(3) "Revenue" or "revenue of the undertaking" means all revenues, income, and earnings arising out of or in connection with the operation or ownership of the undertaking and, if so stated in the resolution or resolutions authorizing the issuance of obligations under this article, also means moneys received as grants from the United States of America, from this state, or from any instrumentality or agency of the foregoing in aid of such undertaking.

(4) "Undertaking" includes the following revenue-producing undertakings or any combination of two or more of such undertakings, whether now existing or hereafter acquired or constructed:

(A) Causeways, tunnels, viaducts, bridges, and other crossings;

(B) Highways, parkways, airports, docks, piers, wharves, terminals, and other facilities;

(C) Systems, plants, works, instrumentalities, and properties:

(i) Used or useful in connection with the obtaining of a water supply and the conservation, treatment, and disposal of water for public and private uses;

(ii) Used or useful in connection with the collection, treatment, and disposal of sewage, waste, and storm water; together with all parts of any such undertaking and all appurtenances thereto, including lands, easements, rights in land, water rights, contract rights, franchises, approaches, dams, reservoirs, generating stations, sewage disposal plants, intercepting sewers, trunk connecting and other sewer and water mains, filtration works, pumping stations, and equipment;

(iii) Used or useful in connection with the collection, treatment, reuse, or disposal of solid waste; or

(iv) Used or useful in connection with buying, constructing, extending, operating, and maintaining gas or electric generating and distribution systems together with all necessary appurtenances thereof; provided, further, any revenue certificates issued to buy, construct, extend, operate, and maintain electric generating and distribution systems shall, before being undertaken, be authorized by a majority of those voting at an election held for the purpose in the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision affected, the election for such to be held in the same manner as is used in issuing bonds of such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision and the said elections shall be called and provided for by officers in charge of the fiscal affairs of said county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision affected;

(D) Dormitories, laboratories, libraries, and other related facilities;

(E) Parks, golf links and fairways, tennis courts, swimming pools, playgrounds, athletic fields, grandstands and stadiums; buildings to be used for various types of sports, including baseball and football; buildings to be constructed and used for the housing of exhibits for fairs and educational purposes; buildings to be used for the housing of livestock, horses, cattle, swine, poultry, and agricultural exhibits for exhibition purposes; the erection and construction of buildings to be used for amusement purposes or educational purposes or a combination of the two; and such buildings to be used for fairs, expositions, or exhibitions in connection therewith;

(F) Combinations of sea wall, groin, and beach erosion protection systems;

(G) Public parking areas and public parking buildings;

(H) Purchase of lands used by the United States government as army camps for the training of soldiers during the war, when and if the same is declared surplus by the United States government or its authority, provided that a county shall only be allowed to purchase lands which were within its boundaries at the time such lands were acquired by the United States government or any division of the United States government;

(I) Parking meters on streets, thoroughfares, parkways, and any avenue of traffic, such meters to be located thereon or immediately adjacent thereto for the purpose of providing space for vehicles and authorizing the use of same for parking purposes upon the payment of a charge therefor;

(J) Purchase of existing public common carriers of passengers for hire and facilities necessary, incident, or needful thereto by the use of motor buses, trackless trolleys, electric trolleys, or any other means of transportation of passengers on the streets and highways;

(K) The purchase of land and the construction thereon of facilities for lease to industries, so as to relieve abnormal unemployment conditions; and

(L) Jails and all other structures and facilities which are necessary and convenient for the operation of jails.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 2; Ga. L. 1939, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 973, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 20, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 188, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 422, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 46, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 489, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 410, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 588, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 709, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 839, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1995, p. 286, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 862, § 2.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005) and 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Construction of sewer system is clearly undertaking contemplated under the Revenue Bond Law, O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36. Kelley v. City of Griffin, 257 Ga. 407, 359 S.E.2d 644 (1987).

Creation of water district and system outside city approved. - Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) defines a "municipality" (now "governmental body") to be any county, city, or town of this state. It authorizes any such municipality to create a water district and to construct, operate, and maintain a water system which may be located wholly without the municipality, or partially within and partially without the municipality. City of Trenton v. Dade County, 75 Ga. App. 326, 43 S.E.2d 432 (1947).

Combining waterworks and sewage systems approved. - Argument that the waterworks system is a proprietary and revenue-producing function, and that the sewage system is a governmental function, and for this reason the two cannot be combined into one system, notwithstanding any authority to do so under this section, is without merit. Under Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), it is expressly provided that water systems and sewerage systems may be combined. Reed v. City of Smyrna, 201 Ga. 228, 39 S.E.2d 668 (1946).

Word "terminal" as used in the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) means a place provided by or for any type of common carrier, including buildings and structures incidental to their services, such as shelters and enclosures for the comfort and convenience of passengers, or for the care and safety of freight pending shipment or delivery to consignee or to connecting carriers. Beazley v. De Kalb County, 210 Ga. 41, 77 S.E.2d 740 (1953).

County payments to airport authority's sinking fund as "revenue." - Under a contract between county and airport authority for use by the county of an expanded airport facility, although the county's consideration would not be paid directly to the authority, but paid to the custodian of the authority's sinking fund, the consideration did not lose its character as "revenue" for the authority and such payment scheme was not a reason to deny validation of the authority's revenue bonds. Clayton County Airport Auth. v. State, 265 Ga. 24, 453 S.E.2d 8 (1995).

Hotel/motel tax proceeds were revenue. - Hotel/motel tax funding agreement for a stadium project worked with a bond proceeds funding agreement to ensure that the stadium's tax proceeds were expended consistent with O.C.G.A. § 48-13-51(a)(5)(B), and there was no requirement that the development authority own the stadium for the tax proceeds to be considered as part of the revenue to pay for the bonds: under O.C.G.A. § 36-82-61(3), "revenue" included revenues arising out of or in connection with the operation or ownership of the stadium. Cottrell v. Atlanta Dev. Auth., 297 Ga. 1, 770 S.E.2d 616 (2015).

No law makes county commissioners individually the governing body of the county in cases of water systems financed by revenue bonds or certificates. Gwinnett County v. Archer, 102 Ga. App. 813, 118 S.E.2d 97 (1960).

County was proper party plaintiff in suit alleging that former commissioners paid an excessive fee to the commissioners' attorney and improperly delegated to the attorney the authority to settle with and pay other attorneys in connection with establishment of a water system financed by revenue anticipation bonds. Gwinnett County v. Archer, 102 Ga. App. 813, 118 S.E.2d 97 (1960).

Cited in Dade County v. State, 77 Ga. App. 139, 48 S.E.2d 144 (1948); Fort Oglethorpe v. Catoosa County, 80 Ga. App. 188, 55 S.E.2d 753 (1949); Johnston v. Clayton County Water Auth., 222 Ga. 39, 148 S.E.2d 417 (1966); Austin Enters., Inc. v. DeKalb County, 222 Ga. 232, 149 S.E.2d 461 (1966); Hospital Auth. v. Stewart, 226 Ga. 530, 175 S.E.2d 857 (1970); Norton Realty & Loan Co. v. Board of Educ., 129 Ga. App. 668, 200 S.E.2d 461 (1973); City of Jonesboro v. Clayton County Water Auth., 136 Ga. App. 768, 222 S.E.2d 76 (1975); Krause v. City of Brunswick, 242 Ga. 659, 251 S.E.2d 239 (1978); Ware v. Henry County Water & Sewerage Auth., 258 Ga. App. 778, 575 S.E.2d 654 (2002); McLeod v. Columbia County, 278 Ga. 242, 599 S.E.2d 152 (2004).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Application of section to buildings constructed for educational purposes. - While counties are authorized to issue revenue bonds in paragraph (2) of this section, and while an "undertaking" is said to include buildings constructed for educational purposes under paragraph (4), both Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I) and this section require that the funds must be for a revenue-producing facility and that the obligations be paid only from revenue produced by this revenue-producing facility. 1954-56 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 222.

Housing for teachers not included. - Since subparagraph (4)(E) contains no general language, despite the fact that reference is made to housing facilities for swine, cattle, etc., it does not include housing for teachers. Cattle, swine, and other domestic animals constitute only one type of personal property belonging to the school which would require housing no different than class room furniture or laboratory supplies and which would be used as an integral part of the educational operation, whereas the home or living quarters of a teacher would not fall in the same category. 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 140.

General phrase "other related facilities" in subparagraph (4)(D) cannot be construed to include housing facilities for teachers. The specific subjects, i.e., "dormitories, laboratories, libraries," enumerated prior to the general phrase "other related facilities," all relate to facilities that constitute an integral part of the physical school properties for use by the students and public generally, whereas housing facilities would not be construed as a part of the school plant or for use by the public generally, notwithstanding the incidental public benefit to be derived therefrom in facilitating the employment of desirable teachers. 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 140.

County cannot make donations to water and sewerage authority, but the county can enter into contracts with such authority. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-225.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 1, 280. 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 13, 74, 86 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1 et seq., 268. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2167.

36-82-62. Powers as to undertakings and revenue bonds generally.

Statute text

(a) In addition to the other powers which it may have, any governmental body shall have power under this article:

(1) To acquire, by gift, purchase, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain, and to construct, to reconstruct, to improve, to better, and to extend any undertaking wholly within or wholly outside the governmental body or partially within and partially outside the governmental body; and to acquire, by gift, purchase, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain, lands, easements, rights in lands, and water rights in connection therewith. For property located within a city, the extraterritorial exercise of eminent domain for redevelopment purposes shall be approved by resolution by the governing authority of the city. For property located in an unincorporated area of a county, the extraterritorial exercise of eminent domain for redevelopment purposes shall be approved by resolution by the governing authority of the county. Any such resolution shall be adopted under the procedures specified in Code Section 22-1-10 and shall specifically and conspicuously delineate each parcel to be affected. The requirement for approval by a governing authority under this Code section shall be in addition to any other approval required by Title 22;

(2) To operate and maintain any undertaking for its own use, for the use of public and private consumers, and for users within and outside the territorial boundaries of the governmental body;

(3) To prescribe, revise, and collect rates, fees, tolls, or charges for the services, facilities, or commodities furnished or made available by such undertaking; and, in anticipation of the collection of the revenues of the undertaking:

(A) To issue revenue bonds to finance, in whole or in part, the cost of the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of any undertaking;

(B) To issue revenue bonds at any time to refund or refinance, in whole or in part, all outstanding revenue bonds against any existing undertaking or any combination thereof or its anticipated revenue; and

(C) To issue revenue bonds at any time to refund or refinance, in whole or in part, all obligations or debt of any nature, including outstanding revenue bonds or general obligation bonds, against any existing undertaking or any combination thereof or its anticipated revenue;

(4) To pledge to the punctual payment of such bonds and interest thereon all or any part of the revenues of the undertaking (including the revenues of improvements, betterments, or extensions thereto thereafter constructed or acquired as well as the revenues of existing systems, plants, works, instrumentalities, and properties of the undertaking so improved, bettered, or extended) or of any part of the undertaking;

(5) To fix the value of existing undertakings at the time the governmental body desires to reconstruct, improve, better, or extend the undertaking and to pledge to the payment of the revenue bonds and the interest thereon issued for the undertaking under this article such part of the revenues of the undertaking as the cost of the reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of the undertaking bears to such cost plus the value of the existing undertaking before reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension. This paragraph shall not be construed to restrict or limit the powers granted in paragraph (4) of this Code section; and

(6) To make all contracts, execute other instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this article, or in the performance of its covenants or duties, or in order to secure the payment of its bonds, provided that no encumbrance mortgage or other pledge of property of the governmental body shall be created thereby, that no property of the governmental body shall be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of such bonds, and that no debt on the credit of the governmental body shall be thereby incurred in any manner for any purpose.

(b) The use of streets, thoroughfares, parkways, and avenues of traffic in a governmental body for the handling of mobile and foot traffic, the use of same for the parking of mobile equipment, and the availability of off-street parking facilities for such equipment are matters of public concern and the affording of such facilities serves the better welfare of the citizens of a governmental body and may, in the discretion of a governmental body, be considered as one revenue-producing undertaking. If any governmental body desires to acquire, construct, alter, or remodel any property for use as public parking areas or public parking buildings or both and issues revenue bonds in order to finance the acquisition, construction, alteration, or remodeling of the same in accordance with this article, the governmental body may pledge to the payment of the principal, interest, and call premium, if any, of such revenue bonds, the whole or any part of the receipts of parking meters operated by the governmental body, in addition to the revenues derived directly from such public parking areas or public parking buildings or both.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 3; Ga. L. 1939, p. 362, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 455, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 489, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2197, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 24/HB 1313.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as 'The Landowner's Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.'"

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews. - For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006). For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Attack of unconstitutionality on ground of failure to evaluate properties cannot be made against paragraph (a)(4) of this section. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Constitutionality of methods of repaying bonds. - If a municipality desires, a municipality may pledge the entire revenue of existing facilities, along with the revenues from improvements made thereon with funds secured by the issuance of revenue anticipation bonds, to the payment of these certificates and the interest thereon, or the municipality may value the existing facilities, and by following the formula provided in this section, eliminate from the revenue pledged for payment of the bonds that revenue derived from existing facilities on which improvements were made. By the express terms of Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), the acts of a municipality under the above provisions of law are authorized by and contravene no provisions of the Constitution. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) gives power of eminent domain to authorities such as the Clayton County Water Authority, duly created by act of the General Assembly, and there is no merit in the assertion that the condemnation of an easement for sewage lines over a person's land proceeded illegally because such authority is without authority to exercise the right of eminent domain. Johnston v. Clayton County Water Auth., 222 Ga. 39, 148 S.E.2d 417 (1966).

While the act creating the Henry County Water and Sewerage Authority (HCWSA) did not expressly grant HCWSA the power of eminent domain, the act did grant the HCWSA the power to build and maintain water systems both within and without the limits of the county, and to join the governing authority in the issuance of revenue-anticipation certificates; accordingly, the HCWSA possessed the power of eminent domain as granted under O.C.G.A. § 36-82-62(a). Ware v. Henry County Water & Sewerage Auth., 258 Ga. App. 778, 575 S.E.2d 654 (2002).

Paragraph (a)(5) of this section by its terms in no way restricts or limits powers granted by paragraph (a)(4). Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Section does not permit changes in contracts. - In view of the fact that this section authorized municipalities and public authorities "to make all contracts" a court could not interpret this legislation as allowing changes in contracts except in accordance with the provisions contained in such agreements. Legally binding contracts must be honored. City of Jonesboro v. Clayton County Water Auth., 136 Ga. App. 768, 222 S.E.2d 76 (1975).

Power to collect fees independent. - Power of cities and counties to collect fees, tolls, or other charges from undertakings such as causeways, parking meters, and other endeavors is clearly independent of power to issue revenue bonds, otherwise a county could not operate parking meters without a revenue bond issue and could not charge for meter parking after the bonds were paid. Krause v. City of Brunswick, 242 Ga. 659, 251 S.E.2d 239 (1978).

Although O.C.G.A. § 36-82-62 is part of Georgia's Revenue Bond Law, the power to operate and maintain an undertaking and the power to collect fees or charges from undertakings are clearly independent of the power to issue revenue bonds. McLeod v. Columbia County, 278 Ga. 242, 599 S.E.2d 152 (2004).

Revenue of existing facilities may be pledged to payment of certificates. - It is clear from this section that if a municipality desires, the municipality may pledge the entire revenue of existing facilities, along with the revenues from improvements made thereon with funds secured by the issuance of revenue anticipation bonds, to the payment of these bonds and the interest thereon, or the municipality may value the existing facilities, and by following the formula provided in this article eliminate from the revenue pledged for payment of the bonds that revenue derived from existing facilities on which improvements were made. By the express terms of Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), the acts of a municipality under the above provisions of law are authorized and contravene no provisions of the Constitution. Dade County v. State, 77 Ga. App. 139, 48 S.E.2d 144 (1948).

Bonds issued to extend existing system of improvements approved. - Under the provisions of the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) and the constitutional sanction thereof (Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I)), revenue anticipation bonds may be issued by a municipality to extend an existing system of municipal improvements by pledging the entire revenue of the whole system to the payment thereof, subject to the rights of holders of prior issues, without pro-rating the values of the existing and the new facilities and pledging only the revenue of such new facilities according to their proportion to the total value. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Municipality has authority to operate sewage treatment facilities. Schanck v. Town of Hephzibah, 236 Ga. 530, 224 S.E.2d 354 (1976).

Improvement of waterworks approved. - When it appeared that revenue anticipation bonds were to be issued by a town for improvement of waterworks under the authority and in accordance with the method prescribed by the Constitution and the laws incorporated therein by reference thereto, the proposed issuance of the revenue anticipation bonds, the proceeding for validation, and the judgment of validation were not contrary to any provisions of the Constitution. Thigpen v. Town of Davisboro, 81 Ga. App. 610, 59 S.E.2d 522 (1950).

Power to exercise eminent domain outside city limits to establish city sewer system under the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), and the requirement under Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. III(b)(2) that the city must have a contract with the county to provide sewer services to county residents, are not mutually exclusive. Kelley v. City of Griffin, 257 Ga. 407, 359 S.E.2d 644 (1987).

Cited in Miller v. Head, 186 Ga. 694, 198 S.E. 680 (1938); Reed v. City of Smyrna, 201 Ga. 228, 39 S.E.2d 668 (1946); Findley v. City of Vidalia, 78 Ga. App. 581, 51 S.E.2d 542 (1949); Johnson v. State, 107 Ga. App. 16, 128 S.E.2d 651 (1962); Austin Enters., Inc. v. DeKalb County, 222 Ga. 232, 149 S.E.2d 461 (1966).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Power of eminent domain not limited by zoning regulations. - Municipalities have the right to use public property, located within their corporate city limits, for necessary governmental purposes, regardless of existence of any contrary zoning regulations which prohibit such usage. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U81-1.

Eminent domain beyond corporate city limits. - Georgia municipalities have power of eminent domain, even beyond corporate city limits, for public works financed by revenue bonds. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U81-1.

Municipalities need not comply with county zoning regulations when constructing waste-water and sewerage treatment facilities beyond city limits. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U81-1.

Doubtful that university may issue revenue obligations. - Legal ability of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia to incur debt by issuing revenue obligations is doubtful. 1988 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 88-21.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 26 Am. Jur. 2d, Eminent Domain, § 1 et seq. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 423 et seq., 470 et seq. 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 72 et seq.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1142 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1358 et seq. 64A C.J.S. Municipal Corporations, § 2118 et seq.

ALR. - Power of municipality to acquire and operate ice plant, 68 A.L.R. 872.

Implied power of municipality to operate nursery, quarry, gravel pit, or other operation for production of material needed for carrying out powers expressly conferred upon it, 104 A.L.R. 1342.

Power of municipality to charge nonresidents higher fees than residents for use of municipal facilities, 57 A.L.R.3d 998.

36-82-63. Adoption of resolution authorizing undertaking and issuance of revenue bonds.

Statute text

The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of any undertaking and the issuance, in anticipation of the collection of the revenues of such undertaking, of bonds to provide funds to pay the cost thereof, may be authorized under this article by resolution or resolutions of the governing body, which may be adopted at a regular or special meeting by a majority of the members of the governing body. Unless otherwise provided therein, such resolution or resolutions shall take effect immediately and need not be laid over or published or posted. The governing body, in determining such cost, may include all costs and estimated costs of the issuance of the bonds; all engineering, inspection, fiscal, and legal expenses; interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for six months thereafter on money borrowed or which it is estimated will be borrowed pursuant to this article; and moneys not in excess of an amount equal to 15 percent of the total principal amount of each such bond issue, to establish a debt service reserve with respect to principal and interest requirements on the bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2062, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Requirements of resolution. - Resolution and bonds become a contract between the municipality and bond purchasers which the latter can enforce by mandamus, and the resolution must contain the essential contractual element of definiteness and certainty with reference to the project or improvement to be built or effected. Such a resolution must reasonably show the nature, kind, and location, and such other facts as will with reasonable fullness and definiteness describe and define the undertaking including the estimated costs thereof. Miller v. State, 83 Ga. App. 135, 62 S.E.2d 921 (1951).

Revenue bonds must be issued to pay for a definite undertaking, reasonable details of which must be contemplated, chosen, and planned by the governing body of the municipality. It is not absolutely necessary that an intricate and detailed set of plans be incorporated in the resolution but enough facts concerning the proposed project or improvement must appear to afford a key from which the full picture of the project or improvement may be ascertained, such as, for example, a reference to reasonably specific plans, maps, and specifications or their equivalent. Miller v. State, 83 Ga. App. 135, 62 S.E.2d 921 (1951).

Resolution sufficient when it refers to plans on file in clerk's office. - Validation proceeding was not subject to motion to dismiss for vagueness and indefiniteness when the resolution of the municipal authorities by which the proceeding was instituted referred to engineering plans and specifications on file in the office of the clerk of council of the city, which contained sufficient detailed information to afford a key by which the full picture of the project might be ascertained. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Approximate fixing of costs necessary. - The very purpose of the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) is to pay for planned improvements. The approximate fixing of the costs is as vital a part of the resolution as the authorization of the bonds. They are supplemental and inseparable, and indispensable to the rights of the municipality and the municipality's citizens and to the purchasers of the certificates. Miller v. State, 83 Ga. App. 135, 62 S.E.2d 921 (1951).

Cited in Miller v. Head, 186 Ga. 694, 198 S.E. 680 (1938); Dade County v. State, 77 Ga. App. 139, 48 S.E.2d 144 (1948); Findley v. City of Vidalia, 78 Ga. App. 581, 51 S.E.2d 542 (1949).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 117.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2135, 2136.

ALR. - Power and discretion of officer or board authorized to issue bonds of governmental unit as regards terms or conditions to be included therein, 119 A.L.R. 190.

36-82-64. Issuance of revenue bonds generally; form; terms; signatures; interim receipts; negotiability; nontaxability.

Statute text

Revenue bonds may be issued under this article in one or more series; may bear such date or dates; may mature at such time or times, not exceeding 40 years from their respective dates; may bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding 9 percent per annum, payable at such time or times; may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places; may be in such denomination or denominations; may be in such form, either coupon or registered; may carry such registration, conversion, and exchangeability privileges; may be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium; may be declared or become due before the maturity date thereof; may be executed in such manner; and may contain such terms, covenants, assignments, and conditions as the resolution or resolutions authorizing the issuance of such bonds may provide. All bonds issued under this article bearing the signature of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding, notwithstanding that before delivery thereof and payment therefor such officers whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to be officers of the governmental body issuing the bonds. Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, interim receipts, in such form and with such provisions as the governing body may determine, may be issued to the purchaser or purchasers of bonds to be issued under this article. Such bonds and interim receipts shall be negotiable for all purposes. Such bonds shall be and are declared to be nontaxable for any and all purposes.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 5; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1050, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 129, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1010, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 23, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Repeal of interest rate limitations, § 36-82-123.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Requirements of resolution. - Resolution and bonds become a contract between the municipality and bond purchasers which the latter can enforce by mandamus, and the resolution must contain the essential contractual element of definiteness and certainty with reference to the project or improvement to be built or effected. Such a resolution must reasonably show the nature, kind, and location and such other facts as will with reasonable fullness and definiteness describe and define the undertaking including the estimated costs thereof. Miller v. State, 83 Ga. App. 135, 62 S.E.2d 921 (1951).
